Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 1. Districts.

§ 69-27-1.
Short title.

This article may be known and cited as the “Soil and Water Conservation District Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4940; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-2.
State Soil and Water Conservation Committee renamed; transfer of powers and duties to State Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

The State Soil and Water Conservation Committee is hereby renamed the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission. The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall retain all powers and duties as were accorded to the committee, and wherever the term “State Soil and Water Conservation Committee” or “committee” appears in any law heretofore or hereafter enacted, the same shall be construed to mean the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 357, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1974).

§ 69-27-3.
Legislative determinations and declarations of policy.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination:

The condition.— That good soil and usable water are essential to the success of agricultural activities in the State of Mississippi; that our farms, forests and grazing lands are among the basic assets of the state; and that the preservation of these lands and usable waters is necessary to protect and promote the health, safety and prosperity of the people.

That improper land usage causes the breaking of natural cover, and results in serious soil erosion of the farms, forests and grazing lands by uncontrolled waters; that erosion feeds itself, causing an accelerated washing of sloping fields and pastures, speeding up with the removal of absorptive topsoil, causing exposure of less absorptive and less protective but more erodible subsoil; that failure by any landowner or operator to conserve the soil and water and control erosion upon his lands causes a washing of soil from his lands onto other lands and makes the conservation of soil and water and control of erosion on such other lands difficult or impossible; that good soil and water usage is possible only through joint actions of farmers, ranchers and foresters made possible through legislative action.

The consequences.— That the consequences of such soil erosion in the form of soil-washing are the silting and sedimentation of stream channels, reservoirs, dams, ditches, and harbors and the movement of silt into creeks, rivers, ponds, lakes and bayous contributing to the pollution of the surface waters of the state; the piling up of soil on lower slopes, and its deposit over alluvial plains; the reduction in productivity or outright ruin of rich bottom lands by overwash of poor subsoil material, sand, and gravel swept out of the hills; deterioration of soil and its fertility, deterioration of crops grown thereon, and declining acre yields despite development of scientific process for increasing such yields; loss of soil and water which causes destruction of food and cover for wildlife; a washing of soil into streams which silts over spawning beds, and destroys water plants, diminishing the food supply of fish; a diminishing of the underground and surface water reserve, which causes water shortages, intensifies periods of drought and causes crop failures; and increase in the speed and volume of rainfall runoff, causing severe and increasing floods, which bring suffering, disease, and death; impoverishment of families attempting to farm eroding and eroded lands; damage to roads, highways, railways, farm buildings and other property from floods; and losses in navigation, hydro-electric power, municipal water supply, farming and grazing. Other consequences are the loss of surface soil and water because of the denuding of the forests, and the abuse and erosion of sloping lands; the declining mean low flow of the rivers reducing the amount of surface water available seasonally for beneficial use; the decrease in effectiveness and decline of ground water reaching aquifers which provide a source of water for beneficial use; and the increase in rates of runoff from sloping land, adding to flood damage of the flood plains and valleys of the state; all adding to the drainage problem.

The appropriate corrective methods.— That to conserve soil and water resources and control and prevent soil erosion, it is necessary that practices contributing to soil and water wastage and soil erosion be discouraged and discontinued, and appropriate water and soil conserving practices be adopted and carried out; that among the procedures necessary for widespread adoption, are the carrying on of engineering operations such as the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, dikes, ponds, lakes, ditches, and the like; the utilization of strip cropping, lister furrowing, contour cultivating, and contour furrowing; seeding and planting of waste, sloping, abandoned, or eroded lands to water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees, and grasses; afforestation and reforestation; rotation of crops; soil stabilization with trees, grasses, legumes, and other thick-growing, soil-holding crops, retardation of runoff by increasing absorption of rainfall; and retirement from cultivation of steep, highly erodible areas and areas now badly gullied or otherwise eroded.

Declaration of policy.— It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature to provide for the conservation of the water and soil resources of this state, and for the control and prevention of soil erosion, and thereby to preserve natural resources, control floods, prevent impairment of dams and reservoirs, assist in maintaining the navigability of rivers and harbors, preserve wildlife, protect the tax base, protect public lands, and protect and promote the health, safety, prosperity, and general welfare of the people of this state.

It is further declared to be the policy of the legislature to alleviate and prevent flood damage; to conserve the waters of the state through improvement and cover, and through impoundments and effective use for various beneficial purposes; to develop private lands and waters of the state for recreational purposes; to promulgate soil and water conservation practices and measures which beautify the landscape, and promote the economic welfare of communities, counties, and areas of the state; and to provide leadership through soil and water conservation districts to other governmental agencies, departments and private groups in the promotion of the conservation of land, water, and related resources.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4941; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-5.
Levee districts excepted.

None of the provisions of this article shall apply to any county which is in whole or in part within a levee district bordering on the Mississippi River, unless an order has been passed by the board of supervisors of such county after thirty (30) days notice by publication of its intention so to do.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4955; Laws, 1938, ch. 253.

§ 69-27-7.
Definitions.

Wherever used or referred to in this article, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“District” or “soil and water conservation district” means a governmental subdivision of this state, and a public body, corporate and politic, organized in accordance with the provisions of this article, for the purposes, with the powers and subject to the restrictions hereinafter set forth.

“Commissioner” means one of the members of the governing body of a district, elected or appointed in accordance with the provisions of this article.

“Committee” or “State Soil and Water Conservation Committee” means the state and soil and water conservation commission as renamed under the provisions of Section 67-27-2 and created in Section 69-27-9.

“Petition” means a petition filed under the provisions of Section 69-27-15 for the creation of a district.

“Nominating petition” means a petition filed under the provisions of Section 69-27-31 to nominate candidates for the office of commissioner of a soil and water conservation district.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“Agency of this state” includes the government of this state and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the government of this state.

“United States” or “agencies of the United States” includes the United States of America, the United States Department of Agriculture, and any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Government” or “governmental” includes the government of this state, the government of the United States, and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

“Landowner” or “owner of land” includes any person, firm or corporation who shall hold legal or equitable title to any lands lying within a district organized under the provisions of this article.

“Land operator” or “operator of land” includes any person, firm or corporation, other than the owner, who shall be in possession of any lands lying within a district organized under the provisions of this article, whether as lessee, renter, tenant or otherwise.

“Due notice” means notice published at least three (3) times with an interval of at least seven (7) days between each publication date, in a newspaper of general circulation within the area where the land proposed to be included in a conservation district is located, or if no such newspaper or general circulation be available, by posting at a reasonable number (not less than five (5)) of conspicuous places within such area, such posting to include posting one (1) copy upon the bulletin board of the courthouse of each county where any of the lands in such proposed district may be located. Notice shall also be given by United States mail to all of the landowners of the proposed district or the district of any hearing or election. At any hearing held pursuant to such notice, at the time and place designated in such notice, adjournment may be made from time to time without the necessity of renewing such notice for such adjourned dates.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4942; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 3; Laws, 1974, ch. 357, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1974).

§ 69-27-9.
State Soil and Water Conservation Commission; members; compensation; seal, records, rules and regulations.

The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall be constituted as follows:

Eleven (11) voting members:

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce;

The State Forester;

The President of the Mississippi Association of Soil and Water Conservation District Commissioners;

The first vice president of the association;

The second vice president of the association;

The immediate or most recent ex-president of the association willing and able to serve; and

Five (5) members to be elected from the membership of the soil and water conservation district commissioners at the annual meeting of the association, one (1) from each United States congressional district by a caucus of the association members from each congressional district as constituted at the time of the caucus, to be elected as follows: First District, one (1) member elected for a one-year term, beginning January 1, 1968, and ending January 1, 1969, his successor to be similarly elected at the 1968 annual meeting of the association for a three-year term ending January 1, 1972, and each successor elected in the succeeding third annual meeting for a three-year term; Second District, one (1) member elected for a two-year term beginning January 1, 1968, and ending January 1, 1970, his successor to be similarly elected at the 1969 annual meeting of the association for a three-year term ending January 1, 1973, and each successor elected in the succeeding third annual meeting for a three-year term; Third District, election to be similar to the Second District; Fourth District, one (1) member elected for a three-year term beginning January 1, 1968, and ending January 1, 1971, each successor to be similarly elected at the succeeding third annual meeting for a three-year term; Fifth District, election to be similar to Fourth District.

The elected members of the board as constituted on January 15, 2003, shall continue to serve until the expiration of their respective terms. As the terms of the five (5) members expire, the members shall be elected as follows: one (1) member from each congressional district by caucus of the association members from each congressional district as constituted at the time of the caucus and the remainder to be elected from the state at large by the membership of the association. The position and term of the member elected from the Third District whose term expires January 1, 2004, shall be the term and position of the at large member.

The purpose of the above procedure is to provide that when put into effect, elected members will serve three-year staggered terms. The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission is empowered to adopt and carry out procedures for filling unexpired terms of its elected members. The incumbent will continue to serve until his successor is duly qualified and enters into the duties of his office.

Two (2) members shall serve ex officio and without voting power, but with all privileges of discussion and debate as follows:

The Director of the State Extension Service; and

The Director of the State Agricultural and Forestry Experimental Station.

Such nonvoting ex officio member who, due to the pressure of his other required official duties, believes that he will be unable to regularly attend meetings of the commission shall designate a substitute to attend in his stead with the same rights and privileges that he would have had.

The commission shall designate its chairman and vice chairman and may, from time to time, change such designation. A majority of the voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be required for its determination. The voting members of the commission shall receive a per diem at the uniform rate established in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, for their services on the commission for not more than thirty-six (36) days in any one calendar year. In addition, and in the discretion of the commission, all members may be entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties on the commission, not to exceed the rate established in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, for state officers and employees. The commission may provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who shall be entrusted with funds or property, shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations and orders issued or adopted, and shall provide for an annual audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements by the State Auditor.

The commission shall keep a record of its official actions, shall adopt a seal, which seal shall be judicially noticed, and may perform such acts, hold such public hearings, and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the execution of its functions under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4943; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1960, ch. 158; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 4; Laws, 1972, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 357, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 12, 2003.).

§ 69-27-11.
Soil and Water Conservation Commission employees; office of accommodations.

The State Soil and Water Conservation committee may employ an administrative officer and such technical experts and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. The committee may call upon the Attorney General of the state for such legal services as it may require, or may employ its own counsel and legal staff. It shall have authority to delegate to its chairman, to one or more of its members, or to one or more agents or employees such powers and duties as it may deem proper. The committee shall supply itself with suitable office accommodations at Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science or at Jackson, or at any place where the committee shall designate. Upon request of the committee, for the purpose of carrying out any of its functions, the supervising officer of any state agency or of any state institution of learning shall, insofar as may be possible under available appropriations, and having due regard for the needs of the agency to which the request is directed, assign or detail to the committee, members of the staff or personnel of such agency or institution of learning, the duty of making such special reports, surveys or studies as the committee may request.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4943; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1960, ch. 158; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-13.
General duties and powers of Commission.

The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall have the following duties and powers:

To offer any assistance as may be appropriate to the commissioners of soil and water conservation districts in the carrying out of their powers and programs.

To keep the commissioners of each of the districts informed of the activities and experience of all other districts, and to facilitate cooperation between districts.

To coordinate the programs of the soil and water conservation districts.

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies and of agencies of this state in the work of the districts.

To disseminate information concerning the activities and programs of the soil and water conservation districts, and to encourage the formation of districts.

To seek and receive grants of monies, and other assets, from any source to carry out this article.

To distribute any appropriated or other funds or assets under its control, from state, federal or other governmental agencies or political subdivisions, or from private grants, including matching funds to districts.

To establish and administer qualification standards for district commissioners and officers.

To give guidance and overall supervision to districts when assistance is requested, or acceptable.

To study, classify and evaluate land use needs and problems in the State of Mississippi; to make recommendations leading to adoption of land use policy and broad guidelines for meeting the needs and problems so identified.

To demonstrate to landowners and operators within the state, equipment that will demonstrate energy and soil and water conservation.

To enter into and to authorize the executive director to execute with the approval of the commission, contracts, grants, cooperative agreements and memoranda of understanding with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution location inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the purposes of this article.

To cooperate with the Commission on Environmental Quality in addressing agricultural nonpoint source pollution. Subject to Section 49-17-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, the Commission on Environmental Quality and the commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding which shall establish the commission’s role in nonpoint source pollution issues.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4943; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1960, ch. 158; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 4; Laws, 1972, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 69-27-14.
Wildflower Seed Revolving Fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund designated as the Wildflower Seed Revolving Fund to be used by the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission to contract for the purchase of wildflower seeds from public or private providers, for resale to local conservation districts or other governmental entities for planting programs.

The Wildflower Revolving Fund shall be funded by monies received from the sale of seeds to the local conservation districts or other governmental entities. Monies collected from the sales shall be deposited into the Wildflower Revolving Fund. The State Treasurer shall make disbursements for payment of purchase of wildflower seeds upon requisition by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission and upon the issuance of warrants by the Department of Finance and Administration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 69-27-15.
Soil and Water Conservation districts; petition for creation.

Any twenty-five (25) owners of land lying within the limits of the territory proposed to be organized into a district may file a petition with the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee asking that a soil and water conservation district be organized to function in the territory described in the petition. Such petition shall set forth:

The proposed name of said district.

That there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, for a soil and water conservation district to function in the territory described in the petition.

A description of the territory proposed to be organized as a district, which description shall not be required to be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but shall be deemed sufficient if generally accurate.

A request that the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee duly define the boundaries for such district; that a referendum be held within the territory so defined on the question of the creation of a soil conservation district in such territory; and that the committee determine that such a district be created.

Where more than one petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee may consolidate all or any such petitions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-17.
Soil and water conservation districts; hearing and determination of necessity therefor.

Within sixty (60) days after a petition pursuant to Section 69-27-15 has been filed with the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee, it shall cause due notice to be given of a proposed hearing upon the question of the desirability and necessity in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare, of the creation of such district, upon the question of the appropriate boundaries to be assigned to such district, upon the propriety of the petition and other proceedings taken under this article, and upon all questions relevant to such inquiries. All owners and all operators of land within the limits of the territory described in the petition, and of lands within any territory considered for addition to such described territory, and all other interested parties, shall have the right to attend such hearings and to be heard. If it shall appear upon the hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed district territory outside of the area within which due notice of the hearing has been given, the hearing shall be adjourned and due notice of further hearing shall be given throughout the entire area considered for inclusion in the district, and such further hearing held. After such hearing, if the committee shall determine, upon the facts presented at such hearing and upon such other relevant facts and information as may be available, that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, for a soil and water conservation district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record such determination, and shall define, by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, the boundaries of such district. In making such determination and in defining such boundaries, the committee shall give due weight and consideration to the topography of the area considered and of the state, the composition of soils therein, the distribution of erosion, the prevailing water and land use practices, the desirability and necessity of including within the boundaries the particular lands under consideration and the benefit such lands may receive from being included within such boundaries, the relation of the proposed area to existing watersheds and agricultural regions, and to other soil and water conservation districts already organized or proposed for organization under the provisions of this article, and such other physical, geographical, and economic factors as are relevant, having due regard to the legislative determinations set forth in Section 69-27-3. The territory to be included within such boundaries need not be contiguous. If the committee shall determine after such hearing, after due consideration of the said relevant facts, that there is no need for a soil and water conservation district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record such determination and shall deny the petition. After twelve (12) months shall have expired from the date of the denial of any such petition, subsequent petitions covering the same or substantially the same territory may be filed as aforesaid and new hearings held and determinations made thereon. If it be determined that there is no need for such soil and water conservation district, then in no event shall any expense or part thereof, incurred in connection with the hearing or other proceedings had to determine such question, be assessed against any landowner or other party except those landowners signing the original petition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-19.
Soil and water conservation districts; referendum; commission to pay expenses.

After the committee has made and recorded a determination that there is need, in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare, for the organization of a district in a particular territory and has defined the boundaries thereof, it shall consider the question whether the operation of a district within such boundaries with the powers conferred upon soil and water conservation districts in this article is administratively practicable and feasible. To assist the committee in the determination of such administrative practicability and feasibility, it shall be the duty of the committee, within a reasonable time after entry of the finding that there is need for the organization of the proposed district and the determination of the boundaries thereof, to hold a referendum within the proposed district upon the proposition of the creation of the district, and to cause due notice of such referendum to be given. The question shall be submitted by ballots upon which the words “for creation of a soil and water conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the county(ies) of_______________and_______________,” and “against creation of a soil and water conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the county(ies) of_______________and_______________,” shall appear, with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of said propositions as the voter may favor or oppose creation of such district. The ballot shall set forth the boundaries of such proposed district as determined by the committee. All owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the territory, as determined by the state soil and water conservation committee, shall be eligible to vote in such referendum. Only such landowners shall be eligible to vote.

The committee shall pay expenses for the issuance of such notices and the conduct of such hearings and referendums as hereinabove provided for and shall supervise the conduct of such hearings and referendums. It shall issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of such hearings and referendums, and providing for the registration prior to the date of the referendum of all eligible voters, or prescribing some other appropriate procedure for the determination of those eligible as voters in such referendum. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate said referendum or the results thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as herein provided and said referendum shall have been fairly conducted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-21.
Results of referendum; determination of district’s administrative feasibility.

The committee shall publish the results of a referendum held pursuant to the provisions of this article and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the committee shall determine that the operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and deny the petition. If the committee shall determine that the operation of such district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and shall proceed with the organization of the district in the manner hereinafter provided. In making such determination the committee shall give due regard and weight to the attitude of the owners and operators of lands lying within the defined boundaries, the number of landowners eligible to vote in such referendum in favor of the creation of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the landowners of the proposed district, the probable expenses of carrying on erosion-control operations within such district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to such determination, having due regard to the legislative determinations set forth in Section 69-27-3, but the committee shall not have authority to determine that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum upon the proposition of creation of the district shall have been cast in favor of the creation of such district. In the event a majority of the votes cast in the referendum shall not have been cast in favor of the creation of such district, then in no event shall any of the expenses incident to the conduct of the referendum, investigation or other proceedings had in connection therewith be assessed against any party other than such parties as signed the original petition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-23.
Organization of soil and water conservation district; procedure; certificate of due organization.

If the committee shall determine that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall appoint two (2) commissioners to act, with the three (3) commissioners elected as provided hereinafter, as the governing body of the district. Such district shall be a governmental subdivision of this state and a public body, corporate and politic, upon the taking of the following proceedings:

The two (2) appointed commissioners shall present to the Secretary of State an application signed by them, which shall set forth (and such application need contain no detail other than the mere recitals): (a) that a petition for the creation of the district was filed with the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee pursuant to the provisions of this article, and that the proceedings specified in this article were taken pursuant to such petition; that the application is being filed in order to complete the organization of the district as a governmental subdivision and a public body, corporate and politic, under this article; and that the committee has appointed them as commissioners; (b) the name and official residence of each of the commissioners, together with a certified copy of the appointments evidencing their right to office; (c) the term of office of each of the commissioners; (d) the name which is proposed for the district; and (e) the location of the principal office of the commissioners of the district. The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the said commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the commissioners and knows them to be the officers as affirmed in the application, and that each has subscribed thereto in the officer’s presence. The application shall be accompanied by a statement by the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee, which shall certify (and such statement need contain no detail other than the mere recitals) that a petition was filed, notice issued, and hearing held as aforesaid; that the committee did duly determine that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, for a soil and water conservation district to function in the proposed territory and did define the boundaries thereof; that notice was given and a referendum held on the question of the creation of such district, and that the result of such referendum showed a majority of the votes cast in such referendum to be in favor of the creation of the district; that thereafter the committee did duly determine that the operation of the proposed district is administratively practicable and feasible. The said statement shall set forth the boundaries of the district as they have been defined by the committee.

The Secretary of State shall examine the application and statement, and, if he finds that the name proposed for the district is not identical with that of any other soil and water conservation district of this state or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion or uncertainty, he shall receive and file them and shall record them in an appropriate book of record in his office. If the Secretary of State shall find that the name proposed for the district is identical with that of any other soil and water conservation district of this state, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, he shall certify such fact to the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee, which shall thereupon submit to the Secretary of State a new name for said district, which shall not be subject to such defects. Upon receipt of such new name, free of such defects, the Secretary of State shall record the application and statement, with the name so modified, in an appropriate book of record in his office. When the application and statement have been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the district shall constitute a governmental subdivision of this state and a public body, corporate and politic. The Secretary of State shall make and issue to the said commissioners a certificate, under the seal of the state, of the due organization of the said district, and shall record such certificate with the application and statement. The boundaries of such district shall include the territory as determined by the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee as aforesaid, but in no event shall they include any area included within the boundaries of another soil and water conservation district organized under the provisions of this article.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract, proceeding, or action of the district, the district shall be deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of the aforesaid sections upon proof of the issuance of the aforesaid certificate by the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate duly certified by the Secretary of State shall be admissible in evidence in any such action or proceeding and shall be proof of the filing and contents thereof. However, the procedural steps required for the issuance of a certificate by the Secretary of State may be attacked in any suit or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract, proceeding, or action of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-24.
Authority of municipalities to contribute to soil conservation districts.

The governing authorities of an incorporated municipality within this state are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to make contributions to the various soil conservation districts either now or hereafter located entirely or partially within the county in which the municipality is situated.

This section is intended to be cumulative and not to repeal or limit or abridge any laws in this state which provide for assistance to soil conservation districts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 69-27-25.
Subsequent petitions may be filed twelve months after the negative determination.

After twelve (12) months shall have expired from the date of entry of a determination by the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee that operation of a proposed district is not administratively practicable and feasible, and denial of a petition pursuant to such determination, subsequent petitions may be filed as aforesaid, and action taken thereon in accordance with the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-27.
Inclusion of additional territory within existing district.

Petitions for including additional territory within an existing district may be filed with the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee, and the proceedings herein provided for in the case of petitions to organize a district shall be observed in the case of petitions for such inclusion. The committee shall prescribe the form for such petitions, which shall be as nearly as may be in the form prescribed in this article for petitions to organize a district. Where the total number of landowners in the area proposed for inclusion shall be less than twenty-five (25), the petition may be filed when signed by a majority of the owners of such area, and in such cases no referendum need be held. In referendums upon petitions for such inclusion, only owners of land lying within the proposed additional area shall be eligible to vote.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-29.
Cities and towns, etc., to be included within district.

All cities, towns, villages or other urban or suburban areas lying within the boundaries of a soil and water conservation district established pursuant to the provisions of the state soil and water conservation district law, as amended, with the approval of the governing authorities of said cities, towns or villages, shall be included in and deemed a part of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4944; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1969.